District of Columbia statutes.
49-904

Subsistence stores.

During the annual encampment, or when ordered on duty to aid the civil authorities, the National Guard shall be furnished with subsistence stores, of the kind, quality, and amount allowed and prescribed by the Army. Such stores shall be issued from the stores and supplies appropriated for the use of the Army, upon the approval and by the direction of the Secretary of the Army, to the Commanding General upon his requisitions for the same.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 790, ch. 328, § 57
Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 635, ch. 146, § 65
1981 Ed., § 39-704.
1973 Ed., § 39-804.